Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10E-142] Provisions for properties in
lava zones in the county of Hawaii. (a) Where the mayor of the county of
Hawaii has issued a proclamation declaring the existence of a state of
emergency due to the threat of imminent disaster from a lava flow in a lava
zone, the total number (rounded to the nearest whole number) of property
insurance policies that an insurer may non-renew in a lava zone shall be
limited for each calendar year to five per cent of the total number of covered
policies of the insurer in force in that lava zone.

(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), an insurer
may cancel or non-renew a property insurance policy where:

(1) Premium payments for the policy are not made
after reasonable demand therefor; or

(2) The commissioner determines the financial
soundness of the insurer would be impaired. [L 2015, c 32, pt of §2]

Cross References

Hawaii property insurance association, issuance of new
policies on properties in lava zones, see §431:21-119.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next